New Jersey, session 221, S1006.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. For each school-to-apprenticeship linkage program established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1993, c.268 (C.34:15E-6), the partners participating in the consortium shall consult and gain approval from the United States Department of Labor before making agreements which provide that secondary classroom experience may count as credit toward meeting the requirements of the classroom training portion of a registered apprenticeship. b.    Except as prohibited by State or federal law, for each apprenticeship program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1993, c.268 (C.34:15E-5), the partners participating in the consortium shall consult and gain approval from the United States Department of Labor before making agreements which provide that secondary classroom experience may count as credit toward meeting the requirements of the classroom training portion of a registered apprenticeship. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, a registered apprenticeship model consists of a combination of both classroom-related technical instruction and on-the-job training.  This bill provides that partners participating in the consortium are required to consult and gain approval from the United States Department of Labor before making agreements which provide that secondary classroom experience may count as credit toward meeting the requirements of the classroom training portion of a registered apprenticeship in an already established school-to-apprenticeship linkage program. The bill provides that partners participating in the consortium are required to consult and gain approval from the United States Department of Labor before making agreements which provide that secondary classroom experience may count as credit toward meeting the requirements of the classroom training portion of a registered apprenticeship, except as prohibited by State or federal law, for each apprenticeship program.